Florida, session 2026, HB1225.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
46
47 Section 1. Section 905.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to
48 read:
49 905.27 Testimony and materials not to be disclosed;
50 exceptions.—
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1225 2026
51 (1) As used in this section, the term:
52 (a) "Immediate family member" has the same meaning as in
53 s. 252.515(3).
54 (b) "Sexual abuse" means an act of a sexual nature or
55 sexual act that may be prosecuted under any law of this state.
56 (c) "Survivor" means a victim of an alleged crime of
57 sexual abuse or a capital crime who provided testimony,
58 evidence, or statements in connection with a grand jury
59 proceeding relating to such alleged crime. The term includes a
60 victim of an alleged crime of sexual abuse or a capital crime
61 who was interviewed by an investigator or prosecutor in
62 preparation for a grand jury proceeding even if the victim was
63 not called to testify in the proceeding.
64 (2)(1) Persons present or appearing during a grand jury
65 proceeding, including a grand juror, a state attorney, an
66 assistant state attorney, a reporter, a stenographer, or an
67 interpreter, as well as the custodian of a grand jury record,
68 may not disclose the testimony of a witness examined before the
69 grand jury, or other evidence received by it, or materials
70 preserved pursuant to s. 905.275 except when required by a court
71 to disclose the testimony or materials for the purpose of:
72 (a) Ascertaining whether testimony it is consistent with
73 the testimony given by the witness before the court;
74 (b) Determining whether the witness is guilty of perjury;
75 or
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1225 2026
76 (c) Furthering justice, which can encompass furthering a
77 public interest when the disclosure is requested pursuant to
78 paragraph (3)(c) or (d) (2)(c).
79 (3)(2) It is unlawful for any person knowingly to publish,
80 broadcast, disclose, divulge, or communicate to any other
81 person, or knowingly to cause or permit to be published,
82 broadcast, disclosed, divulged, or communicated to any other
83 person, in any manner whatsoever, any testimony of a witness
84 examined before the grand jury or any materials preserved
85 pursuant to s. 905.275, or the content, gist, or import thereof,
86 except when such testimony or materials are or have is or has
87 been disclosed in any of the following circumstances:
88 (a) When a court orders the disclosure of such testimony
89 pursuant to subsection (2) (1) for use in a criminal case, it
90 may be disclosed to the prosecuting attorney of the court in
91 which such criminal case is pending, and by the prosecuting
92 attorney to his or her assistants, legal associates, and
93 employees, and to the defendant and the defendant's attorney,
94 and by the latter to his or her legal associates and employees.
95 However, the grand jury testimony afforded such persons by the
96 court can only be used in the defense or prosecution of the
97 criminal case and for no other purpose.
98 (b) When a court orders the disclosure of such testimony
99 pursuant to subsection (2) (1) for use in a civil case, it may
100 be disclosed to all parties to the case and to their attorneys
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1225 2026
101 and by the latter to their legal associates and employees.
102 However, the grand jury testimony afforded such persons by the
103 court can only be used in the defense or prosecution of the
104 civil case and for no other purpose.
105 (c) When a court orders the disclosure of such testimony
106 or materials pursuant to subsection (2) (1) in response to a
107 request by the media or an interested person, regardless of
108 whether that purpose is for use in a criminal or civil case, it
109 may be disclosed so long as the subject of the grand jury
110 inquiry is deceased, the grand jury inquiry related to criminal
111 or sexual activity between the subject of the grand jury
112 investigation and a person who was a minor at the time of the
113 alleged criminal or sexual activity, the testimony or materials
114 were was previously disclosed by a court order, and the state
115 attorney is provided notice of the request. This paragraph does
116 not limit the court's ability to limit the disclosure of
117 testimony or materials, including, but not limited to,
118 redaction.
119 (d) When a court orders the disclosure of such testimony
120 or materials pursuant to subsection (2) in response to a request
121 by a survivor or an immediate family member of a survivor,
122 regardless of whether that purpose is for use in a criminal or
123 civil case, the testimony or materials may be disclosed so long
124 as the subject of the grand jury inquiry is deceased and the
125 state attorney is provided notice of the request. This paragraph
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1225 2026
126 does not limit the court's ability to limit the disclosure of
127 testimony or materials, including, but not limited to,
128 redaction.
129 (4)(3) This section does not affect the attorney-client
130 relationship. A client has the right to communicate to his or
131 her attorney any testimony given by the client to the grand
132 jury, any matters involving the client discussed in the client's
133 presence before the grand jury, and any evidence involving the
134 client received by or proffered to the grand jury in the
135 client's presence.
136 (5)(4) A person who violates this section commits a
137 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
138 775.083, or by fine not exceeding $5,000, or both.
139 (6)(5) A violation of this section constitutes criminal
140 contempt of court.
141 Section 2. Section 905.275, Florida Statutes, is created
142 to read:
143 905.275 Preservation of grand jury materials.—
144 (1) The clerk of court shall take possession of and
145 preserve all materials presented or created during a grand jury
146 proceeding. A person may not dispose of or destroy such
147 materials.
148 (2) For purposes of this section, the term "materials"
149 includes all of the following:
150 (a) Digital recordings.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1225 2026
151 (b) Audio and video materials.
152 (c) Paper records produced by members of the grand jury,
153 witnesses, and the court.
154 (d) Any computer; hard drive; electronic storage device or
155 digital recording medium, including, but not limited to,
156 outdated media such as compact discs, DVDs, and floppy discs;
157 and electronic devices from which evidence is recovered during
158 an investigation that leads to a grand jury proceeding.
159 (e) Subpoenas.
160 (f) Any other materials, documents, storage devices,
161 media, and data associated with a grand jury proceeding.
162
163 The term "materials" does not include internal state attorney
164 work product, legal memoranda, or investigative intelligence not
165 presented to the grand jury or entered into the record.
166 (3) The clerk of court shall:
167 (a) Maintain a chain of custody list for grand jury
168 materials during each grand jury proceeding and restrict access
169 to such list. Such list must include the name of any person who
170 accesses the materials, the materials the person accessed, and
171 the time and date that the person accessed the materials. A
172 redacted version of the chain of custody document is a public
173 record.
174 (b) Store in secured, sealed containers all grand jury
175 related materials that are in his or her possession and shall
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1225 2026
176 keep such containers in a secure location in the courthouse that
177 is free from mold, water, dust, and other storage hazards.
178 (c) Prohibit unauthorized persons, such as maintenance
179 personnel, visitors, and staff who are not employees of the
180 clerk of court, from accessing or viewing the stored materials.
181 (d) Retain a chain of custody list outside the place in
182 which grand jury materials are stored which documents all of the
183 following:
184 1. The name of any person who accesses the materials.
185 2. The materials the person accessed.
186 3. The time and date the person accessed the materials.
187 (4) If the state attorney or any of his or her employees
188 possesses any of the materials described in subsection (2) which
189 were not presented to the grand jury or were not otherwise made
190 part of the court record, he or she shall preserve such
191 materials.
192 (5) All materials preserved pursuant to this section must
193 be retained for 50 years after any criminal proceedings
194 associated with such materials have concluded unless a court
195 orders otherwise.
196 (6) The Office of the State Courts Administrator shall
197 adopt uniform statewide rules for retention, management, and
198 storage of grand jury materials to ensure consistency and reduce
199 burdens on clerks of court. The Office of the State Courts
200 Administrator may perform inspections to confirm that clerks of
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1225 2026
201 court are in compliance with this section.
202 (7) A person or entity who possesses or stores any grand
203 jury materials as described in this section shall disclose and
204 provide access to such materials upon a court order pursuant to
205 s. 905.27.
206 (8) Any person who intentionally destroys or alters any of
207 the materials described in subsection (2) commits a felony of
208 the third degree, as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
209 775.084. The Department of Law Enforcement shall investigate
210 alleged violations of the preservation requirements in this
211 section.
212 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1225-00